Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-1101, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-1101. A. Until July 1, 2026 2027, the following are
hereby authorized to engage in harm-reduction services:
1. Government entities including, but not limited to, the State
Department of Health and the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services; provided, no state dollars shall be used
to purchase hypodermic needles;
2. Religious institutions or churches;
3. Nonprofit organizations;
4. For-profit companies;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2012 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. Nongovernment entities partnering with a governmental
agency; and
6. Tribal governments.
B. Those offering harm-reduction services shall register with
the State Department of Health and may engage in the following
activities in order to reduce the use of drugs, prevent outbreaks of
infectious diseases and reduce morbidity among people who use
injection drugs:
1. Offer referrals and resources to treat substance use
disorders;
2. Provide education on the risk of transmission of infectious
diseases, including human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and viral
hepatitis;
3. Rapid testing for HIV, hepatitis C and sexually transmitted
infections (STIs);
4. Referrals for medical and mental health services;
5. Collect used hypodermic needles for safe disposal;
6. Possess and distribute hypodermic needles, cleaning kits,
test kits and opioid antagonists; and
7. Rapid substance testing products used, intended for use, or
fashioned specifically for the use in identifying or analyzing the
potency or toxicity of unknown substances.
C. Registered providers of harm-reduction services shall report
at least quarterly to the State Department of Health and annually to
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2012 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate:
1. The number of clients served including basic demographic
information;
2. Number and type of referrals provided;
3. Number of syringes, test kits and antagonists distributed;
4. Number of used syringes collected; and
5. Number of rapid HIV and viral hepatitis tests performed
including the number of reactive test results.
D. The State Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules for
the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
April 21, 2025 - DO PASS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2012 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)